District of Columbia statutes.
1-1211

Record of official acts; certified copies.

Each notary public shall keep a fair record of all his official acts, except such as are mentioned in § 1-1210, and when required, shall give a certified copy of any record in his office to any person upon payment of the fees therefor.

History

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1280, ch. 854, § 569

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 1-811.
1973 Ed., § 1-512.